District of Columbia statutes.
48-106

Furnishment of samples for analysis.

Every person offering for sale or delivering to any purchaser any drug or article of food included in the provisions of this chapter shall furnish to any analyst or other officer or agent of the Mayor a sample sufficient for the purpose of analysis of any such drug or article of food which is in his possession. The Mayor may collect, without cost, and examine samples of food sufficient to analyze in order to determine compliance with this chapter.

Feb. 17, 1898, 30 Stat. 247, ch. 25, § 6
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 2(e), 49 DCR 1945
1981 Ed., § 33-106.
1973 Ed., § 33-106.
D.C. Law 14-116 substituted “Mayor” for “Director of Public Health”, deleted “, who shall apply to him for the purpose and shall tender him the value of the same,” preceding “a sample sufficient”, and added the last sentence.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).
Health Department abolished: The Health Department of the District of Columbia, including the office of the head thereof, was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 57 of the Board of Commissioners, dated June 30, 1953, and Reorganization Order No. 52, dated June 30, 1953, combined and redesignated Organization Order No. 141, dated February 11, 1964, established, under the direction and control of a Commissioner, a Department of Public Health headed by a Director, for the purpose of planning, implementing, and directing public health and hospital care programs, and for performing certain other allied medical and paramedical functions. The Anatomical Board was established under the direction and control of the Director of Public Health consisting of members as prescribed in the D.C. Code. Prior to redesignation, the Order abolished the previously existing Health Department, Gallinger Hospital, Glenn Dale Sanatorium, and the Anatomical Board, and transferred their functions and positions to the new Department. The organization of the new Department was set out in the Order. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions stated in Organization Order No. 141 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Human Resources by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969, as amended by Commissioner’s Order No. 70-83, dated March 6, 1970. The Department of Human Resources was replaced by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, dated February 21, 1980, which Plan established the Department of Human Services.